Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.534

Exhaustion of administrative remedies.

A person may file a petition for judicial review under this chapter only after exhausting all administrative remedies available within the agency whose action is being challenged, or available within any other agency authorized to exercise administrative review, except:

(1) A petitioner for judicial review of a rule need not have participated in the rule-making proceeding upon which that rule is based, have petitioned for its amendment or repeal, have petitioned the joint administrative rules review committee for its review, or have appealed a petition for amendment or repeal to the governor;

(2) A petitioner for judicial review need not exhaust administrative remedies to the extent that this chapter or any other statute states that exhaustion is not required; or

(3) The court may relieve a petitioner of the requirement to exhaust any or all administrative remedies upon a showing that:

(a) The remedies would be patently inadequate;

(b) The exhaustion of remedies would be futile; or

(c) The grave irreparable harm that would result from having to exhaust administrative remedies would clearly outweigh the public policy requiring exhaustion of administrative remedies.

[ 1997 c 409 s 302; 1995 c 403 s 803; 1988 c 288 s 507.]

NOTES:

Part headings—Severability—1997 c 409: See notes following RCW 43.22.051.

Findings—Short title—Intent—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 34.05.328.